District of Columbia statutes.
24-221.01c

Credits for good behavior, rehabilitation programs, work details, and special projects.

(a)

A person sentenced for a misdemeanor whose conduct complies with institutional rules shall be eligible to receive good time credits of up to 3 credits per calendar month for good behavior, as prescribed by applicable rules.

(b)

A person sentenced for a misdemeanor who demonstrates successful participation in one or more rehabilitation programs, work details, or special projects shall be eligible to receive good time credits of up to 3 credits per calendar month for each such program, detail, or project, as prescribed by applicable rules.

(c)

No person shall receive more than 8 credits per calendar month under sections § 24-221.01 and this section combined.

(d)

Good time credits shall be computed from the day on which a person is first incarcerated. In a case in which the person is later sentenced for a misdemeanor, the good time credits shall not be awarded until after a sentence is imposed.

Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-218, § 3c
as added May 17, 2011, D.C. Law 18-372, § 2(a), 58 DCR 7